North Carolina statutes. Chapter 10B. Notaries.
Part 4. Electronic Notary Records, Maintenance, and Disposition.

§ 10B-125.
Electronic signature, electronic seal.

The notary’s electronic signature in combination with the electronic notary seal shall be used only for the purpose of performing electronic notarial acts.

The Secretary shall adopt rules necessary to establish standards, procedures, practices, forms, and records relating to a notary’s electronic signature and electronic seal. The notary’s electronic seal and electronic signature shall conform to any standards adopted by the Secretary.

History.

2005-391, s. 4.

§ 10B-126.
Security measures.

A notary shall safeguard the notary’s electronic signature, the notary’s electronic seal, and all other notarial records. Notarial records shall be maintained by the notary, and the notary shall not surrender or destroy the records except as required by a court order or as allowed under rules adopted by the Secretary.

When not in use, the notary shall keep the notary’s electronic signature, electronic seal, and all other notarial records secure, under the exclusive control of the notary, and shall not allow them to be used by any other notary or any other person.

A notary shall do the following within 10 days of discovering that the notary’s electronic seal or electronic signature has been stolen, lost, damaged, or otherwise rendered incapable of affixing a legible image:

Inform the appropriate law enforcement agency in the case of theft or vandalism.

Notify the appropriate register of deeds and the Secretary in writing and signed in the official name in which he or she was commissioned.

The Secretary may adopt rules necessary to insure the integrity, security, and authenticity of electronic notarizations.

The Secretary may require an electronic notary to create and to maintain a record, journal, or entry of each electronic notarial act. The rule-making authority contained in this subsection shall become effective 18 months after December 1, 2005.

The failure of an electronic notary to produce within 10 days of the Department’s request any record required by a rule adopted under this section shall result in the suspension of the electronic notary’s power to act as a notary under the provision of this Chapter until the Secretary reinstates the notary’s commission.

Upon resignation, revocation, or expiration of an electronic notary commission, or death of the notary, all notarial records required by statute or rule shall be delivered to the Secretary.

History.

2005-391, s. 4.

§ 10B-127.
Maintenance of electronic device.

An electronic notary shall take reasonable steps to ensure that any registered device used to create the notary’s electronic signature is current and has not been revoked or terminated by its issuing or registering authority.

If the registration of the device used to create electronic signatures either expires or is changed during the electronic notary’s term of office, the notary shall cease performing electronic notarizations until:

A new device is duly issued or registered to the notary; and

An electronically signed notice is sent to the Secretary that shall include the starting and expiration dates of any new registration term and any other new information at variance with information in the most recently executed electronic registration form.

History.

2005-391, s. 4.

§ 10B-128.
Disposition of records.

Upon compliance with

G.S. 10B-127

and except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, when an electronic notary’s commission expires or is resigned or revoked, or when an electronic notary dies, the notary or the notary’s duly authorized representative shall erase, delete, or destroy the coding, disk, certificate, card, software, file, or program that enables electronic affixation of the notary’s official electronic signature.

A former electronic notary whose previous commission or application was not revoked or denied by the Secretary need not erase, delete, or destroy the coding, disk, certificate, card, software, file, or program enabling electronic affixation of the official electronic signature if he or she is recommissioned and reregistered as an electronic notary using the same electronic signature within three months after commission expiration.

History.

2005-391, s. 4.

§§ 10B-129 through 10B-134.

Reserved for future codification purposes.